Hawaii statutes.
[§350E-5] Entering agreements with other
states. The officers and agencies of this State and its subdivisions
having authority to place children may enter into agreements with appropriate
officers or agencies of or in other party states pursuant to paragraph (b) of
Article V of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children. Any such
agreement which contains a financial commitment or imposes a financial
obligation on this State or subdivision or agency thereof shall not be binding
unless it has the approval in writing of the director of finance in the case of
the State and of the chief local fiscal officer in the case of a subdivision of
the State. [L 1985, c 132, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next